Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-143
Paupers; inmates of public charitable institutions; clothing; county of last residence to furnish.

Whenever any inmate of any public charitable institution shall be unable to provide suitable clothing for himself, and shall have no parent or legal guardian able and legally bound to do so, the county board of the county where the inmate last resided, before entering or applying for admission into the institution, shall adjudge and declare the inmate a pauper. The proper officers of the institution shall then provide suitable clothing for such person, and the inmate shall send the bill therefor to the county board. The county board shall then audit and allow the bill and cause a warrant therefor to be drawn upon the general fund of the county in favor of the officers of the institution.

Laws 1875, § 1, p. 177;

R.S.1913, § 7208;

C.S.1922, § 6859;

C.S.1929, § 83-130;

R.S.1943, § 83-143.